Washington statutes.
RCW 11.20.100

Laws applicable to foreign wills.

All provisions of law relating to the carrying into effect of domestic wills after probate thereof shall, so far as applicable, apply to foreign wills admitted to probate in this state.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.20.100. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 23; RRS s 1393; prior: Code 1881 s 1371; 1877 p 284 s 2.]